Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.890

Boundary changes—Providing factual information—Notice to boundary review board.

A city or town may provide factual information on the effects of a proposed boundary change on the city or town and the area potentially affected by the boundary change. A statement that the city or town has such information available, and copies of any printed materials or information available to be provided to the public shall be filled [filed] with the boundary review board for the board's information.

[ 1989 c 84 s 70.]